Maryland, session 2025, HB1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–117.
(a) In this section, “sexual abuse” means any act that involves:
(1) An adult allowing or encouraging a child to engage in:
– 1 –

Ch. 104 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Obscene photography, films, poses, or similar activity;
(ii) Pornographic photography, films, poses, or similar activity; or
(iii) Prostitution;
(2) Incest;
(3) Rape;
(4) Sexual offense in any degree; or
(5) Any other sexual conduct that is a crime.
(b) Except as provided under subsection (d) of this section and notwithstanding
any time limitation under a statute of limitations, a statute of repose, the Maryland Tort
Claims Act, the Local Government Tort Claims Act, or any other law, an action for damages
arising out of an alleged incident or incidents A CLAIM OR CLAIMS of sexual abuse that
occurred while the victim was a minor may be filed at any time.
(c) Except as provided in §§ 5–303 and 5–518 of this title and § 12–104 of the
State Government Article, the total amount of noneconomic damages that may be awarded
under this section to a single claimant in an action against a single defendant for injuries
arising from an incident or occurrence A CLAIM OR CLAIMS that would have been barred
by a time limitation before October 1, 2023, may not exceed:
(1) FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2025, $1,500,000;
AND
(2) FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025, $700,000.
(d) (1) [No action] THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO ACTIONS for
damages UNDER THIS SECTION that would have been barred by a time limitation before
October 1, 2023[,].
(2) AN ACTION may NOT be brought [under this section] if the alleged
victim of abuse is deceased at the commencement of the action.
(3) AN ACTION AGAINST THE STATE OR A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT MAY NOT BE FILED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026.
(E) IN ANY ACTION FOR DAMAGES FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025,
ARISING OUT OF A CLAIM OR CLAIMS OF SEXUAL ABUSE THAT OCCURRED WHILE THE
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 104
CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR, COUNSEL MAY NOT CHARGE OR RECEIVE FEES THAT
EXCEED:
(1) 20% OF THE SETTLEMENT; OR
(2) 25% OF THE JUDGMENT.
5–303.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection, the
liability of a local government may not exceed $400,000 per an individual claim, and
$800,000 per total claims that arise from the same occurrence for damages resulting from
tortious acts or omissions, or liability arising under subsection (b) of this section and
indemnification under subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The limits on liability provided under paragraph (1) of this subsection
do not include interest accrued on a judgment.
(3) If the liability of a local government arises from intentional tortious acts
or omissions or a violation of a constitutional right committed by a law enforcement officer,
the following limits on liability apply:
(i) Subject to item (ii) of this paragraph, the combined award for
both economic and noneconomic damages may not exceed a total of $890,000 for all claims
arising out of the same incident or occurrence, regardless of the number of claimants or
beneficiaries who share in the award; and
(ii) In a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed 150% of the
limitation established under item (i) of this paragraph, regardless of the number of
claimants or beneficiaries who share in the award.
(4) If the liability of a local government arises from [a claim] ONE OR
MORE CLAIMS of sexual abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of this title, THAT OCCURRED WHEN
THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR:
(I) FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2025
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the liability may not exceed
$890,000 to a single claimant for injuries arising from [an incident or occurrence] THE
CLAIM OR CLAIMS; AND
(II) FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025, THAT
WOULD HAVE BEEN BARRED BY A TIME LIMITATION BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2023, THE
LIABILITY MAY NOT EXCEED $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR INJURIES
ARISING FROM THE CLAIM OR CLAIMS.
– 3 –

Ch. 104 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–518.
(b) A county board of education, described under Title 4, Subtitle 1 of the
Education Article, may raise the defense of sovereign immunity to:
(1) Any amount claimed above the limit of its insurance policy; or
(2) If self–insured or a member of a pool described under § 4–105(c)(1)(ii)
of the Education Article:
(i) Except as provided in item (ii) of this item, any amount above
$400,000; or
(ii) If the liability of the county board of education arises from [a
claim] ONE OR MORE CLAIMS of sexual abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of this title, THAT
OCCURRED WHEN THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR:
1. FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2025
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM, any amount above $890,000 to a single
claimant for THE CLAIM OR claims [arising from an incident or occurrence]; AND
2. FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025,
THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN BARRED BY A TIME LIMITATION BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2023,
ANY AMOUNT ABOVE $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR THE CLAIM OR CLAIMS.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a county board
of education may not raise the defense of sovereign immunity to any claim of $400,000 or
less.
(2) If liability of a county board of education arises under [a claim] ONE
OR MORE CLAIMS of sexual abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of this title, THAT OCCURRED
WHEN THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR:
(I) FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2025 EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the liability may not exceed $890,000
to a single claimant for injuries arising from [an incident or occurrence] THE CLAIM OR
CLAIMS; AND
(II) FOR FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025,
THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN BARRED BY A TIME LIMITATION BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2023,
THE LIABILITY MAY NOT EXCEED $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR INJURIES
ARISING FROM THE CLAIM OR CLAIMS.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 104
Article – Education
4–105.
(a) (1) Each county board shall carry comprehensive liability insurance to
protect the board and its agents and employees.
(2) The purchase of insurance in accordance with paragraph (1) of this
subsection is a valid educational expense.
(b) (1) The State Board shall establish standards for these insurance policies,
including a minimum liability coverage of not less than:
(i) [$890,000 for each occurrence] THE THE AMOUNTS SPECIFIED
UNDER § 5–518(C)(2) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE for claims of sexual abuse made under
§ 5–117 of the Courts Article THAT OCCURRED WHEN THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR; and
(ii) $400,000 for each occurrence for all other claims.
(2) The policies purchased under this section shall meet these standards.
(c) (1) A county board complies with this section if it:
(i) Is individually self–insured for [at least $890,000 for each
occurrence under] THE AMOUNTS SPECIFIED UNDER § 5–518(C)(2) OF THE COURTS
ARTICLE AND MEETS the rules and regulations adopted by the State Insurance
Commissioner; or
(ii) Pools with other public entities for the purpose of self–insuring
property or casualty risks under Title 19, Subtitle 6 of the Insurance Article.
(2) A county board that elects to self–insure individually under this
subsection periodically shall file with the State Insurance Commissioner, in writing, the
terms and conditions of the self–insurance.
(3) The terms and conditions of this individual self–insurance:
(i) Are subject to the approval of the State Insurance Commissioner;
and
(ii) Shall conform with the terms and conditions of comprehensive
liability insurance policies available in the private market.
(d) A county board shall have the immunity from liability described under §
5–518 of the Courts and Judicial Proceedings Article.
– 5 –

Ch. 104 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – State Government
12–104.
(a) (1) Subject to the exclusions and limitations in this subtitle and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the immunity of the State and of its units is
waived as to a tort action, in a court of the State, to the extent provided under paragraph
(2) of this subsection.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, the liability of the State and its units may not exceed $400,000 to a single
claimant for injuries arising from a single incident or occurrence.
(ii) If liability of the State or its units arises from intentional tortious
acts or omissions or a violation of a constitutional right committed by a law enforcement
officer, the following limits on liability shall apply:
1. subject to item 2 of this subparagraph, the combined
award for both economic and noneconomic damages may not exceed a total of $890,000 for
all claims arising out of the same incident or occurrence, regardless of the number of
claimants or beneficiaries who share in the award; and
2. in a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed 150% of the
limitation established under item 1 of this item, regardless of the number of claimants or
beneficiaries who share in the award.
(iii) If liability of the State or its units arises under [a claim] ONE OR
MORE CLAIMS of sexual abuse, as defined in § 5–117 of the Courts Article, THAT
OCCURRED WHEN THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR:
1. FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR BEFORE MAY 31, 2025
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the liability may not exceed
$890,000 to a single claimant for injuries arising from [an incident or occurrence] THE
CLAIM OR CLAIMS; AND
2. FOR AN ACTION FILED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025,
THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN BARRED BY A TIME LIMITATION BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2023,
THE LIABILITY MAY NOT EXCEED $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR INJURIES
ARISING FROM THE CLAIM OR CLAIMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Supreme Court of
Maryland may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this Act.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 104
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 31,
2027, and each January 31 thereafter, the Maryland Judiciary shall report the following
information to the General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article:
(1) the amount of each award made to a claimant under this Act; and
(2) a summary of the sexual abuse claims underlying the award made to
each claimant.
SECTION 2. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 7 –